District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.43

Waiver of licensure requirements.

The Board of Pharmacy shall waive the educational requirements for an applicant for licensure as a pharmaceutical detailer who can demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the Board, that he or she has been performing the functions of a pharmaceutical detailer, as defined in this subchapter, on a full-time, or substantially full-time, basis for at least 12 months immediately preceding March 26, 2008.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 743
as added Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 102(g), 55 DCR 1659